Washington statutes.
RCW 7.84.140

Authority to delegate or accept enforcement authority over natural resource infractions.

(1) The director chosen by the state parks and recreation commission, the commissioner of public lands, and the director of the department of fish and wildlife are each authorized to delegate and accept enforcement authority over natural resource infractions to or from the other agencies through an agreement entered into under the interlocal cooperation act, chapter 39.34 RCW.

(2) Any person specified in RCW 70A.200.050 may initiate enforcement of RCW 70A.200.060 for those infractions that are natural resource infractions under this chapter, with or without an interlocal agreement under this section.

[ 2024 c 231 s 4; 2011 c 320 s 13.]

NOTES:

Findings—2024 c 231: See note following RCW 70A.200.060.

Effective date—2011 c 320: See note following RCW 79A.80.005.

Findings—Intent—2011 c 320: See RCW 79A.80.005.